Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

16-8-101. Insanity defined - offenses committed before July 1, 1995.

The applicable test of insanity shall be, and the jury shall be so instructed: "A person who is so diseased or defective in mind at the time of the commission of the act as to be incapable of distinguishing right from wrong with respect to that act is not accountable. But care should be taken not to confuse such mental disease or defect with moral obliquity, mental depravity, or passion growing out of anger, revenge, hatred, or other motives, and kindred evil conditions, for when the act is induced by any of these causes the person is accountable to the law.".

The term "diseased or defective in mind", as used in subsection (1) of this section, does not refer to an abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise antisocial conduct.

This section shall apply to offenses committed before July 1, 1995.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 225, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-8-101.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 672, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 490, § 1, effective February 6.

L. 95:

(3) added, p. 71, § 1, effective July 1.

16-8-101.3. Legislative intent in enacting section 16-8-101.5 and in making conforming amendments.

The intent of the general assembly in enacting section 16-8-101.5 and making conforming amendments to sections 16-8-101 to 16-8-104, 16-8-106, 16-8-110, 16-8-114, 16-8-115, and 16-8-120 in 1995, and in enacting clarifying provisions in this section and sections 16-8-104.5 and 16-8-105.5 and making conforming amendments to sections 16-8-105 and 16-8-107 and sections 18-1-802 and 18-1-803, C.R.S., in 1996, was to combine the defense of not guilty by reason of insanity and the affirmative defense of impaired mental condition into the affirmative defense of not guilty by reason of insanity and to create a unitary process for hearing the issues raised by said affirmative defense to apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1995.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 3, § 1, effective January 31.

16-8-101.5. Insanity defined - offenses committed on and after July 1, 1995 - definitions.

The applicable test of insanity shall be:

A person who is so diseased or defective in mind at the time of the commission of the act as to be incapable of distinguishing right from wrong with respect to that act is not accountable; except that care should be taken not to confuse such mental disease or defect with moral obliquity, mental depravity, or passion growing out of anger, revenge, hatred, or other motives and kindred evil conditions, for, when the act is induced by any of these causes, the person is accountable to the law; or

A person who suffered from a condition of mind caused by mental disease or defect that prevented the person from forming a culpable mental state that is an essential element of a crime charged, but care should be taken not to confuse such mental disease or defect with moral obliquity, mental depravity, or passion growing out of anger, revenge, hatred, or other motives and kindred evil conditions because, when the act is induced by any of these causes, the person is accountable to the law.

As used in this section:

"Diseased or defective in mind" does not refer to an abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise antisocial conduct. Evidence of knowledge or awareness of the victim's actual or perceived gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation shall not constitute inability to distinguish right from wrong.

"Gender identity" and "gender expression" have the same meaning as in section 18-1-901 (3)(h.5).

"Mental disease or defect" includes only those severely abnormal mental conditions that grossly and demonstrably impair a person's perception or understanding of reality and that are not attributable to the voluntary ingestion of alcohol or any other psychoactive substance but does not include an abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise antisocial conduct.

"Sexual orientation" has the same meaning as in section 18-9-121 (5)(b).

This section shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1995.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 71, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (SB 20-221), ch. 279, p. 1365, § 2, effective July 13.

L. 2021:

IP(2) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2800, § 14, effective July 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 20-221, see section 1 of chapter 279, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

16-8-102. Other definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

and (2) Repealed.

(2.5) "Forensic psychologist" means a licensed psychologist who is board certified in forensic psychology by the American board of professional psychology or who has completed a fellowship in forensic psychology meeting criteria established by the American board of forensic psychology.

(2.7) (a) "Impaired mental condition" means a condition of mind, caused by mental disease or defect that prevents the person from forming the culpable mental state that is an essential element of any crime charged. For the purposes of this subsection (2.7), "mental disease or defect" includes only those severely abnormal mental conditions which grossly and demonstrably impair a person's perception or understanding of reality and which are not attributable to the voluntary ingestion of alcohol or any other psychoactive substance; except that it does not include an abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise antisocial conduct.

This subsection (2.7) shall apply only to offenses committed before July 1, 1995.

(3) Repealed.

(4) "Ineligible for release" means the defendant is suffering from a mental disease or defect which is likely to cause him to be dangerous to himself, to others, or to the community, in the reasonably foreseeable future, if he is permitted to remain at liberty.

(4.5) "Ineligible to remain on conditional release" means the defendant has violated one or more conditions in his release, or the defendant is suffering from a mental disease or defect which is likely to cause him to be dangerous to himself, to others, or to the community in the reasonably foreseeable future, if he is permitted to remain on conditional release.

(4.7) "Mental disease or defect" means only those severely abnormal mental conditions that grossly and demonstrably impair a person's perception or understanding of reality and that are not attributable to the voluntary ingestion of alcohol or any other psychoactive substance; except that it does not include an abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise antisocial conduct.

(5) "Release examination" means a court-ordered examination of a defendant directed to developing evidence relevant to determining whether he is eligible for release.

(6) "Release hearing" means a hearing for the purpose of determining whether a defendant previously committed to the department of human services, following a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity, has become eligible for release.

(7) Repealed.

(8) "Sanity examination" means a court-ordered examination of a defendant who has entered a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity, directed to developing information relevant to determining the sanity or insanity of the defendant at the time of the commission of the act with which he is charged and also his competency to proceed.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 225, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-8-102.

L. 81:

(4.5) added, p. 932, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2.7) added, p. 672, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(6) amended, p. 2647, § 116, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2.7) amended and (4.7) added, p. 72, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1), (2), (3), and (7) repealed, p. 1850, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2.5) added, (SB 13-116), ch. 115, p. 393, § 1, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (6), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act repealing subsections (1), (2), (3), and (7), see section 1 of chapter 389, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

16-8-103. Pleading insanity as a defense.

The defense of insanity may only be raised by a specific plea entered at the time of arraignment; except that the court, for good cause shown, may permit the plea to be entered at any time prior to trial. The form of the plea shall be: "Not guilty by reason of insanity"; and it must be pleaded orally either by the defendant or by the defendant's counsel. A defendant who does not raise the defense as provided in this section shall not be permitted to rely upon insanity as a defense to the crime charged but, when charged with a crime requiring a specific intent as an element thereof, may introduce evidence of the defendant's mental condition as bearing upon his or her capacity to form the required specific intent. The plea of not guilty by reason of insanity includes the plea of not guilty.

This subsection (1) shall apply only to offenses committed before July 1, 1995.

(1.5) (a) The defense of insanity may only be raised by a specific plea entered at the time of arraignment; except that the court, for good cause shown, may permit the plea to be entered at any time prior to trial. The form of the plea shall be: "Not guilty by reason of insanity"; and it must be pleaded orally either by the defendant or by the defendant's counsel. The plea of not guilty by reason of insanity includes the plea of not guilty.

This subsection (1.5) shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1995.

If counsel for the defendant believes that a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity should be entered on behalf of the defendant but the defendant refuses to permit the entry of the plea, counsel may so inform the court. The court shall then conduct such investigation as it deems proper, which may include the appointment of psychiatrists or forensic psychologists to assist in examining the defendant and advising the court. After its investigation the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether the plea should be entered. If the court finds that the entry of a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity is necessary for a just determination of the charge against the defendant, it shall enter the plea on behalf of the defendant, and the plea so entered shall have the same effect as though it had been voluntarily entered by the defendant himself or herself.

If there has been no grand jury indictment or preliminary hearing prior to the entry of the plea of not guilty by reason of insanity, the court shall hold a preliminary hearing prior to the trial of the insanity issue. If probable cause is not established, the case shall be dismissed, but the court may order the district attorney to institute civil proceedings pursuant to article 65 of title 27, C.R.S., if it appears that the protection of the public or the accused requires it.

Before accepting a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity, the court shall advise the defendant of the effect and consequences of the plea.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 226, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-8-103.

L. 75:

(3) amended, p. 926, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 73, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(3) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 783, § 21, effective April 29.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-116), ch. 115, p. 393, § 2, effective August 7.

16-8-103.5. Impaired mental condition - when raised - procedure - legislative intent.

If the defendant intends to assert the affirmative defense of impaired mental condition, he shall indicate that intention to the court and to the prosecution at the time of arraignment; except that the court, for good cause shown, shall permit the defendant to inform the court and the prosecution of his intention to assert the affirmative defense of impaired mental condition at any time prior to trial.

If counsel for the defendant believes that an assertion of the affirmative defense of impaired mental condition should be entered on behalf of the defendant but the defendant refuses to permit counsel to offer such evidence, counsel may so inform the court. The court shall then conduct such investigation as it deems proper, which may include the appointment of psychiatrists or forensic psychologists to assist in examining the defendant and advising the court. After its investigation, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether evidence of impaired mental condition should be offered at trial. If the court finds that such a defense is necessary for a just determination of the charge against the defendant, it shall inform the prosecution that such defense shall be asserted at trial by the defendant and shall order the defendant's counsel to present evidence at trial on the defense of impaired mental condition.

At the time at which the defendant announces his intention to assert the affirmative defense of impaired mental condition, the court shall advise the defendant of the effect and consequences of asserting the defense.

When the defendant indicates his intention to assert the defense of impaired mental condition, the court shall order an examination of the defendant pursuant to section 16-8-106. The court shall order both the prosecutor and the defendant to exchange the names, addresses, reports, and statements of persons, other than medical experts subject to the provisions of section 16-8-103.6, whom the parties intend to call as witnesses with regard to the affirmative defense of impaired mental condition.

If the trier of fact finds the defendant not guilty by reason of impaired mental condition, pursuant to section 18-1-803 (3), C.R.S., the court shall commit the defendant to the custody of the department of human services until such time as he is found eligible for release, pursuant to the standards set forth in sections 16-8-115 and 16-8-120. The executive director of the department of human services shall designate the state facility at which the defendant shall be held for care and psychiatric treatment and may transfer the defendant from one institution to another if in the opinion of the director it is desirable to do so in the interest of the proper care, custody, and treatment of the defendant or the protection of the public or the personnel of the facilities in question.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the assertion of the affirmative defense of impaired mental condition not be made in such a fashion that it is used to circumvent the requirements of disclosure specified in rule 16 of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure.

A defendant may raise impaired mental condition only through an assertion of affirmative defense.

This section shall apply only to offenses committed before July 1, 1995.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 673, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(6) and (7) added, p. 625, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 87:

(4) amended, p. 622, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(5) amended, p. 2648, § 117, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(8) added, p. 73, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-116), ch. 115, p. 394, § 3, effective August 7.

Cross references:

(1) For affirmative defenses generally, see § 18-1-407.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (5), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

16-8-103.6. Waiver of privilege.

A defendant who places his or her mental condition at issue by pleading not guilty by reason of insanity pursuant to section 16-8-103, or asserting the affirmative defense of impaired mental condition pursuant to section 16-8-103.5, or disclosing witnesses who may provide evidence concerning the defendant's mental condition during a sentencing hearing held pursuant to section 18-1.3-1201 for an offense charged prior to July 1, 2020, or pursuant to section 18-1.3-1302 for an offense charged prior to July 1, 2020, waives any claim of confidentiality or privilege as to communications made by the defendant to a physician or psychologist in the course of an examination or treatment for the mental condition for the purpose of any trial or hearing on the issue of the mental condition, or sentencing hearing conducted pursuant to section 18-1.3-1201 for an offense charged prior to July 1, 2020, or pursuant to section 18-1.3-1302 for an offense charged prior to July 1, 2020. The court shall order both the prosecutor and the defendant to exchange the names, addresses, reports, and statements of any physician or psychologist who has examined or treated the defendant for the mental condition.

This subsection (1) shall apply only to offenses committed before July 1, 1995.

A defendant who places his or her mental condition at issue by pleading not guilty by reason of insanity pursuant to section 16-8-103 or disclosing witnesses who may provide evidence concerning the defendant's mental condition during a sentencing hearing held pursuant to section 18-1.3-1201 for an offense charged prior to July 1, 2020, or pursuant to section 18-1.4-102; or, for offenses committed on or after July 1, 1999, by seeking to introduce evidence concerning his or her mental condition pursuant to section 16-8-107 (3) waives any claim of confidentiality or privilege as to communications made by the defendant to a physician or psychologist in the course of an examination or treatment for the mental condition for the purpose of any trial or hearing on the issue of the mental condition, or sentencing hearing conducted pursuant to section 18-1.3-1201 for an offense charged prior to July 1, 2020, or pursuant to section 18-1.4-102. The court shall order both the prosecutor and the defendant to exchange the names, addresses, reports, and statements of any physician or psychologist who has examined or treated the defendant for the mental condition.

This subsection (2) shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1995.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 622, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 73, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 381, § 2, effective April 21.

L. 99:

(2)(a) amended, p. 403, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1491, § 136, effective October 1.

L. 2002, 3rd Ex. Sess.:

(2)(a) amended, p. 29, §§ 17, 18, effective July 12.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1850, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended, (SB 20-100), ch. 61, p. 205, § 3, effective March 23.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (1)(a) and (2)(a), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2)(a), see section 16 of chapter 1 of the supplement to the Session Laws of Colorado 2002, Third Extraordinary Session. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsections (1)(a) and (2)(a), see section 1 of chapter 389, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

16-8-103.7. Examination after entry of defenses of insanity and impaired mental condition.

When, at the time of arraignment, the defense of insanity is raised, pursuant to section 16-8-103, and the defendant asserts his or her intention to raise the affirmative defense of impaired mental condition, pursuant to section 16-8-103.5, the court shall order one examination of the defendant with regard to both defenses pursuant to section 16-8-106.

This subsection (1) shall apply only to offenses committed before July 1, 1995.

When, at the time of arraignment, the defense of insanity is raised pursuant to section 16-8-103, the court shall order an examination of the defendant with regard to the insanity defense pursuant to section 16-8-106.

This subsection (2) shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1995.

When the defendant gives notice pursuant to section 16-8-107 (3) that he or she intends to introduce evidence in the nature of expert opinion concerning his or her mental condition, the court shall order an examination of the defendant pursuant to section 16-8-106.

The provisions of this subsection (3) shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1999.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 673, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 74, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3) added, p. 404, § 6, effective July 1.

16-8-104. Separate trial of issues.

The issues raised by the plea of not guilty by reason of insanity shall be tried separately to different juries, and the sanity of the defendant shall be tried first. This section shall apply only to offenses committed before July 1, 1995.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 226, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-8-104.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 74, § 8, effective July 1.

16-8-104.5. Single trial of issues.

The issues raised by the plea of not guilty by reason of insanity shall be treated as an affirmative defense and shall be tried at the same proceeding and before the same trier of fact as the charges to which not guilty by reason of insanity is offered as a defense.

This section shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1995.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 3, § 1, effective January 31.

16-8-105. Procedure after plea for offenses committed before July 1, 1995.

When a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity is accepted, the court shall forthwith commit the defendant for a sanity examination, specifying the place and period of commitment.

Upon receiving the report of the sanity examination, the court shall immediately set the case for trial to a jury on the issue raised by the plea of not guilty by reason of insanity. In all cases except class 1, class 2, and class 3 felonies, the defendant may waive jury trial by an express written instrument or announcement in open court appearing of record. If the court and the district attorney consent, jury trial may be waived in a class 1, class 2, or class 3 felony case. Every person is presumed to be sane; but, once any evidence of insanity is introduced, the people have the burden of proving sanity beyond a reasonable doubt.

If the trier of fact finds the defendant was sane at the time of commission of the offense, the court, unless it has reason to believe that the defendant is incompetent to proceed or the question is otherwise raised as provided in section 16-8.5-102, shall immediately set the case for trial on the issues raised by the plea of not guilty. If the question of whether the defendant is incompetent to proceed is raised, the court shall follow the procedure set forth in section 16-8.5-103.

If the trier of fact finds the defendant not guilty by reason of insanity, the court shall commit the defendant to the custody of the department of human services until such time as he is found eligible for release. The executive director of the department of human services shall designate the state facility at which the defendant shall be held for care and psychiatric treatment and may transfer the defendant from one institution to another if in the opinion of the director it is desirable to do so in the interest of the proper care, custody, and treatment of the defendant or the protection of the public or the personnel of the facilities in question.

This section shall apply to offenses committed before July 1, 1995.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 226, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-8-105.

L. 75:

(2) amended, p. 613, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(4) amended, p. 2648, § 118, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(5) added, p. 5, § 2, effective January 31.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 1851, § 5, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 389, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

16-8-105.5. Procedure after plea for offenses committed on or after July 1, 1995.

When a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity is accepted, the court shall forthwith commit the defendant for a sanity examination, specifying the place and period of commitment.

Upon receiving the report of the sanity examination, the court shall immediately set the case for trial. Every person is presumed to be sane; but, once any evidence of insanity is introduced, the people have the burden of proving sanity beyond a reasonable doubt.

When the affirmative defense of not guilty by reason of insanity has been raised, the jury shall be given special verdict forms containing interrogatories. The trier of fact shall decide first the question of guilt as to felony charges that are before the court. If the trier of fact concludes that guilt has been proven beyond a reasonable doubt as to one or more of the felony charges submitted for consideration, the special interrogatories shall not be answered. Upon completion of its deliberations on the felony charges as previously set forth in this subsection (3), the trier of fact shall consider any other charges before the court in a similar manner; except that it shall not answer the special interrogatories regarding such charges if it has previously found guilt beyond a reasonable doubt with respect to one or more felony charges. The interrogatories shall provide for specific findings of the jury with respect to the affirmative defense of not guilty by reason of insanity. When the court sits as the trier of fact, it shall enter appropriate specific findings with respect to the affirmative defense of not guilty by reason of insanity.

If the trier of fact finds the defendant not guilty by reason of insanity, at the request of the defendant, the court may continue the bond pursuant to section 16-4-108 to allow the defendant to remain at liberty or set a hearing to modify the bond pursuant to section 16-4-109 and delay final disposition, delay formal entry of the finding of not guilty by reason of insanity, and stay the commitment of the defendant to the custody of the department of human services pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section until the conclusion of the initial release hearing required pursuant to section 16-8-115 (1)(a). If the defendant is on bond, the court shall order the department of human services to conduct a release examination on an outpatient basis, as well as any other appropriate conditions of release, including participation in outpatient treatment.
(4) (a) (I) If the trier of fact finds the defendant not guilty by reason of insanity, at the request of the defendant, the court may continue the bond pursuant to section 16-4-108 to allow the defendant to remain at liberty or set a hearing to modify the bond pursuant to section 16-4-109 and delay final disposition, delay formal entry of the finding of not guilty by reason of insanity, and stay the commitment of the defendant to the custody of the department of human services pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section until the conclusion of the initial release hearing required pursuant to section 16-8-115 (1)(a). If the defendant is on bond, the court shall order the department of human services to conduct a release examination on an outpatient basis, as well as any other appropriate conditions of release, including participation in outpatient treatment.

In determining whether to continue or modify the bond, the court shall consider the criteria described in section 16-4-103, as well as that the defendant was found not guilty by reason of insanity rather than convicted, the defendant's treatment needs, the availability of treatment in the community, the ability of the department of human services to conduct a release evaluation in the community, whether the department of human services can timely admit the defendant, and the usefulness of an observation period as part of the release evaluation.

The court shall not delay the final disposition and entry of finding of not guilty by reason of insanity unless the defendant is at liberty and requests a delay, in which case the court may delay the final disposition to allow the defendant to post bond for an outpatient release examination.

If the defendant is on bond, the district attorney or a bonding commissioner may file with the court a verified motion to revoke the defendant's bond pursuant to section 16-4-109; except that, if the court finds the defendant violated a bond condition, the court may revoke the bond and enter the final disposition of not guilty by reason of insanity and order the defendant committed to the department of human services.

This subsection (4)(a) does not apply if the court finds that the crime for which the defendant is found not guilty by reason of insanity:

Is a class 1 or class 2 felony;

Resulted in another person suffering serious bodily injury or death;

Involved the defendant using a deadly weapon; or

Involved felony unlawful sexual behavior pursuant to section 16-22-102 (9).

If the trier of fact finds the defendant not guilty by reason of insanity, unless delayed pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, the court shall commit the defendant to the custody of the department of human services until such time as the defendant is found eligible for release. The executive director of the department of human services shall designate the state facility at which the defendant is held for care and psychiatric treatment and may transfer the defendant from one facility to another if in the opinion of the director it is desirable to do so in the interest of the proper care, custody, and treatment of the defendant or the protection of the public or the personnel of the facilities in question.

This section applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1995; except that subsection (4)(a) of this section applies to individuals found not guilty by reason of insanity on or after September 1, 2022.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 4, § 1, effective January 31.

L. 2022:

(4) and (5) amended, (HB 22-1061), ch. 438, p. 3080, § 1, effective August 10.